Maryland, session 2025, HB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
25–403.
(a) (1) Each year the Montgomery County Council and the Prince George’s
County Council shall meet to determine the amount of the system development charge.
(2) The amount of the system development charge for a particular property:
(i) shall be based on the number of plumbing fixtures and the
assigned values for those fixtures as set forth in the Commission’s plumbing and gas fitting
regulations;
(ii) except as provided in item (iii) of this paragraph and subsection
[(c)] (D) (E) of this section, may not exceed $200 per fixture unit; and
– 1 –

Ch. 594 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) for residential properties with five or fewer toilets, shall be based
on the number of toilets per dwelling unit and:
1. for each apartment unit, may not exceed $2,000;
2. for dwellings with one or two toilets, may not exceed
$3,000;
3. for dwellings with three or four toilets, may not exceed
$5,000;
4. for dwellings with five toilets, may not exceed $7,000; and
5. for dwellings with more than five toilets, shall be
calculated on a fixture unit basis.
(3) When determining the system development charge, the county councils
shall consider the actual cost of construction of Commission facilities.
(b) When determining the system development charge, under [criteria]
DEFINITIONS established jointly and agreed on by the county councils, the county councils:
(1) shall grant a full or partial exemption from the charge for public
sponsored or affordable housing as jointly defined and agreed on by the county councils;
(2) FOR PROPERTIES LOCATED IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY ONLY,
SHALL GRANT A FULL OR PARTIAL EXEMPTION FROM THE CHARGE FOR:
(I) 1. REVITALIZATION PROJECTS;
2. PROPERTY USED BY A COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AND HAS THE PRIMARY MISSION AND PURPOSE OF
PROVIDING RECREATIONAL AND EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS AND SERVICES TO
YOUTH, IF:
A. THE PROPERTY IS USED PRIMARILY FOR
RECREATIONAL AND EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS AND SERVICES TO YOUTH; AND
B. THE EXEMPTION AMOUNT IS LIMITED TO $80,000;
3. PROPERTY USED PRIMARILY FOR CHILD CARE OR
AFTER–SCHOOL CARE; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 594
4. PROPERTY USED PRIMARILY FOR PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES FOR DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED INDIVIDUALS; AND
(II) UNDER DEFINITIONS SET FORTH BY THE COUNTY
COUNCILS:
1. RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY LOCATED IN A PLANNED
RETIREMENT COMMUNITY AS DEFINED IN THE ZONING ORDINANCE OF
MONTGOMERY COUNTY;
2. ELDERLY HOUSING OTHER THAN THAT INCLUDED IN
ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM; AND
3. PROPERTIES USED FOR MANUFACTURING OR
BIOTECHNOLOGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT;
(3) FOR PROPERTIES LOCATED IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY ONLY, MAY
NOT REQUIRE THAT AN APPLICANT FOR AN EXEMPTION OWN THE PROPERTY FOR
WHICH AN EXEMPTION IS SOUGHT; AND
[(2)] (4) FOR PROPERTIES LOCATED IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
ONLY, may grant a full or partial exemption from the charge for:
(i) 1. revitalization projects;
[(ii)] 2. property owned by a community–based organization that
is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and has the primary
mission and purpose of providing recreational and educational programs and services to
youth, if:
[1.] A. the property is used primarily for recreational and
educational programs and services to youth; and
[2.] B. the exemption amount is limited to $80,000;
[(iii)] 3. property used primarily for child care or after–school care;
or
[(iv)] 4. property used primarily for programs and services for
developmentally disabled individuals; and
– 3 –

Ch. 594 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(3)] (II) [may grant a full or partial exemption from the system
development charge,] under [conditions] DEFINITIONS set forth by the county councils[,
for]:
[(i)] 1. residential property located in a mixed retirement
development as defined in the zoning ordinance of Prince George’s County;
[(ii) residential property located in a planned retirement community
as defined in the zoning ordinance of Montgomery County;
(iii)] 2. elderly housing other than that included in item [(i) or (ii)]
1 of this item; or
[(iv)] 3. properties used for manufacturing or biotechnology
research and development.
(C) (1) MONTGOMERY COUNTY SHALL APPROVE APPLICATIONS FOR THE
EXEMPTIONS FROM THE SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT CHARGE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS UNTIL
THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL LIMIT, INCLUDING ANY UNUSED AMOUNTS CARRIED OVER
FROM A PRIOR FISCAL YEAR, IS REACHED.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, MONTGOMERY COUNTY
SHALL REPORT TO THE MEMBERS OF THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY DELEGATION TO
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE EXEMPTIONS FROM THE SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT
CHARGE IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY REQUIRED UNDER:
(I) SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING:
1. THE PROCESS USED TO IDENTIFY PUBLICLY
SPONSORED AND AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS;
2. THE NUMBER OF PUBLICLY SPONSORED AND
AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS GRANTED EXEMPTIONS; AND
3. THE NUMBER OF PUBLICLY SPONSORED OR
AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS INCLUDED IN EACH PROJECT; AND
(II) SUBSECTION (B) SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION FOR
THE CURRENT AND IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 594
(I) 1. THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR EACH EXEMPTION;
AND
(II) 2. FOR EACH EXEMPTION:
1. A. THE TOTAL NUMBER OF EXEMPTION APPLICATIONS
RECEIVED; AND
2. B. THE TOTAL NUMBER AND AMOUNT OF EXEMPTIONS
GRANTED.
(D) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
SHALL REPORT TO THE MEMBERS OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY DELEGATION
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE EXEMPTIONS FROM THE SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT
CHARGE IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY DESCRIBED UNDER:
(1) SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING:
(I) THE PROCESS USED TO IDENTIFY PUBLICLY SPONSORED
AND AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS;
(II) THE NUMBER OF PUBLICLY SPONSORED AND AFFORDABLE
HOUSING PROJECTS GRANTED EXEMPTIONS; AND
(III) THE NUMBER OF PUBLICLY SPONSORED OR AFFORDABLE
HOUSING UNITS INCLUDED IN EACH PROJECT; AND
(2) SUBSECTION (B)(4) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING:
(I) THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR EACH EXEMPTION; AND
(II) FOR EACH EXEMPTION:
1. THE TOTAL NUMBER OF EXEMPTION APPLICATIONS
RECEIVED; AND
2. THE TOTAL NUMBER AND AMOUNT OF EXEMPTIONS
GRANTED.
– 5 –

Ch. 594 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(c)] (D) (E) On July 1, 1999, and July 1 of each succeeding year, the maximum
charge, as established in subsection (a)(2) of this section, may be changed by an amount
equal to the prior calendar year’s change in the Consumer Price Index published by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for urban wage
earners and clerical workers for all items for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area, or
the successor index.
[(d)] (E) (F) If the county councils do not agree on the amount of the system
development charge, the system development charge imposed during the previous year
shall continue in effect for the following fiscal year.
[(e)] (F) (G) If the system development charge established by the county councils is
less than the amount necessary to recover the full cost of constructing growth related
facilities, the Commission shall identify the part of the cost of that growth that will be paid
by current ratepayers as:
(1) a percentage of any rate increase; and
(2) the annual monetary amount on a typical residential customer’s annual
water and sewer bill.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 6 –